test/src/morphology/N-suomi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suomi: # Noun 'borg' - full paradigm
     suomi+N+Sg+Nom: suomi
     suomi+N+Sg+Gen: suomen
     suomi+N+Sg+Acc: suomen
     suomi+N+Sg+Par: suomee
     suomi+N+Sg+Tra: suomeksi
     suomi+N+Sg+Abe: suomitta
     suomi+N+Sg+Com: suomheen
     suomi+N+Sg+Ine: suomessa
     suomi+N+Sg+Ela: suomesta
     suomi+N+Sg+Ill: suomheen
     suomi+N+Sg+Ade: suomela
     suomi+N+Sg+Abl: suomelta
     suomi+N+Sg+All: suomele
     suomi+N+Sg+Ess: suomena
     suomi+N+Pl+Nom: suomet
     suomi+N+Pl+Ine: suomissa
     suomi+N+Pl+Ela: suomista
     suomi+N+Pl+Ill: suomiitta
     suomi+N+Pl+Ade: suomila
     suomi+N+Pl+Abl: suomilta
     suomi+N+Pl+All: suomile
     suomi+N+Pl+Ess: suomina


#     suomi+N+Pl+Gen: suomitten %%epäselvä
#     suomi+N+Pl+Acc: suomii %%epäselvä
#     suomi+N+Pl+Par: suomita %%epäselvä
#     suomi+N+Pl+Tra: suomiksi%%epäselvä
#     suomi+N+Pl+Abe: suomitta %%epäselvä
#     suomi+N+Pl+Com: suomein %%epäselvä
